Hawaii statutes.
§663J-7 Statute of limitations. (a) A
claim under this chapter may not be brought against a person more than six
years after an act of promoting prostitution by coercion or sex trafficking by
that person.

(b) The limitation period provided for in this
chapter is tolled:

(1) During the minority of the individual who engages
in prostitution; or

(2) Any time there is a criminal offense
investigation being actively conducted against the defendant by a governmental
agency or there is a criminal offense charge, information, or indictment
pending against the defendant. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 247, §2;
am L 2016, c 206, §8]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next